Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-581
Boundaries; change; objections.

Any owner of real property in the tract or tracts of land to be annexed to such district who did not individually sign a petition for the annexation of the tract or tracts of land to such district and who desires to object to the annexation of the tract or tracts of land to such district may, on or before the date set for the cause to be heard, file objection to the annexation to and incorporation of the tract or tracts of land to such district.

Laws 1951, c. 147, § 8, p. 592.